Washington statutes.
RCW 35.34.205

Administration, oversight, or supervision of utility—Reimbursement from utility budget authorized.

Whenever any city or town apportions a percentage of the city manager's, administrator's, or supervisor's time, or the time of other management or general government staff, for administration, oversight, or supervision of a utility operated by the city or town, or to provide services to the utility, the utility budget may identify such services and budget for reimbursement of the city's or town's current expense fund for the value of such services.

[ 1991 c 152 s 2.]